Alabama, session 2026rs, HB253.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
21 Section 1. Sections 32-6-271 and 32-6-280, Code of
22 Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
23 "§32-6-271
24 (a) A firefighter, upon application and subject to this
25 division, may be issued a distinctive motor vehicle license
26 plate as identification as a firefighter. In addition to the
27 proper numbers, words, and insignias used on the standard
28 license plate issued for motor vehicles, the distinctive
Page 1

license plate issued for motor vehicles, the distinctive
HB253 INTRODUCED
29 plates issued to firefighters shall bear a red Maltese cross
30 emblem on each side to the left and right of the regular tag
31 numbers. The words "Fire Fighter" should be centered at the
32 bottom of the license plate.
33 (b) In addition to any other fees provided for by law,
34 an annual additional fee of one dollar ($1.00) ten dollars
35 ($10) is added to the cost of the firefighter distinctive
36 license plate provided for in this division, effective January
37 1, 2022. The annual additional fee collected pursuant to this
38 section shall be distributed by each licensing official to the
39 state Comptroller, less the commission provided in Section
40 40-12-269. The state Comptroller shall distribute the net
41 proceeds monthly as follows:
42 (1) Fifty cents ($.50)Twenty-five percent shall be
43 deposited into a fund managed by the Alabama Joint Fire
44 Council and shall be used for the purpose of expanding and
45 maintaining the Alabama Firefighter Memorial located in
46 Tuscaloosa.
47 (2) Fifty cents ($.50)Twenty-five percent shall be
48 distributed to the Alabama Joint Fire Council to be used for
49 expenses associated with the Firefighter Peer Support Program.
50 (3) Twenty-five percent shall be distributed to the
51 board of the Alabama Firefighters Annuity and Benefit Fund.
52 (4) Twenty-five percent shall be distributed to the
53 secretary-treasurer of the Alabama Firefighters Emergency
54 Relief Fund.
55 (c) The funds generated by this the fee in subsection
56 (b) shall be subject to audit from either the Department of
Page 2

(b) shall be subject to audit from either the Department of
HB253 INTRODUCED
57 Examiners of Public Accounts or an independent certified
58 public accountant once every three calendar years effective
59 January 1, 2022."
60 "§32-6-280
61 (a) As used in this section division, the following
62 terms shall have the following meanings:
63 (1) Professional firefighterPROFESSIONAL FIREFIGHTER.
64 means aA paid member of a paid or part-paid fire department of
65 a city, town, county, or other subdivision of the state,
66 including the chief, assistant chief, warden, engineer,
67 captain, firemen firefighters, and all other officers and
68 employees of the department who actually engage in fire
69 fighting firefighting or rendering first aid at the scene of
70 an accident.
71 (2) Retired professional firefighterRETIRED
72 PROFESSIONAL FIREFIGHTER. means aA retired member of a paid or
73 part-paid fire department of a city, town, county, or other
74 subdivision of the state, including the chief, assistant
75 chief, warden, engineer, captain, firemen firefighters, and
76 all other officers and employees of the department who
77 actually engaged in fire fighting firefighting or rendering
78 first aid at the scene of an accident. Notwithstanding any
79 other provision of this division, retired professional
80 firefighter the term includes a retired professional
81 firefighter who is a resident of this state and who has
82 retired from a professional fire department in another state
83 and otherwise meets the requirements of this section division.
84 (b)(1) Notwithstanding Sections 32-6-64, 32-6-67, and
Page 3

(b)(1) Notwithstanding Sections 32-6-64, 32-6-67, and
HB253 INTRODUCED
85 32-6-68, a professional firefighter or a retired professional
86 firefighter, upon application and subject to the provisions of
87 this section division, may be issued a distinctive motor
88 vehicle license plate as identification as a professional
89 firefighter or a retired professional firefighter, and a
90 professional firefighter, upon application and subject to this
91 section, may be issued a distinctive motor vehicle license
92 plate as identification as a professional firefighter.
93 (2) In addition to the proper numbers, words, and
94 insignias used on the standard license plate issued for motor
95 vehicles, the distinctive plates so license plate issued for a
96 retired professional firefighter shall have a design created
97 by the state association of professional firefighters in
98 coordination with the Mobile Retired Firefighters and
99 Paramedics Association and the Tuscaloosa Retired Firefighters
100 Association, and the distinctive license plate so issued for a
101 professional firefighter shall have a design created by the
102 state association of professional firefighters.
103 (c)(1) The distinctive license plates provided herein
104 shall be approved by the Commissioner of Revenue and shall be
105 issued through the judge of probate, license commissioner, or
106 other license issuing official of the several counties of the
107 state in the same manner as are other motor vehicle license
108 plates, and the officers shall be entitled to their regular
109 fees for the service.
110 (2) By December 1 of each year, the Firefighters'
111 Personnel Standards and Education Commission shall submit to
112 the judge of probate, the license commissioner, or other
Page 4

the judge of probate, the license commissioner, or other
HB253 INTRODUCED
113 license issuing official of each county a list of eligible
114 professional firefighters and retired professional
115 firefighters retired from paid or part-paid fire departments
116 under this section. The Firefighters' Personnel Standards and
117 Education Commission shall also add to the list any retired
118 professional firefighter retired from a paid or part-paid fire
119 department in from another state who submits proof to the
120 commission of eligibility pursuant to this division. The
121 Firefighters' Personnel Standards and Education Commission
122 shall also submit to the judge of probate, the license
123 commissioner, or other license issuing official of each county
124 a list of eligible professional firefighters from paid or
125 part-paid fire departments.
126 (3) Any person individual who joins a paid or part-paid
127 fire department after December 1 of any year or any person
128 individual who is omitted from the list prepared as described
129 in subdivision (2) may obtain a distinctive license plate by
130 presenting to the license issuing official proof of his or her
131 membership in a paid or part-paid fire department by means of
132 a certificate signed by the chief of the department on a form
133 prescribed by the Firefighters' Personnel Standards and
134 Education Commission.
135 (4) Upon the initial application for a retired
136 professional firefighter distinctive license plate under this
137 section, an applicant for a distinctive license plate provided
138 in this section shall present to the judge of probate, the
139 license commissioner, or other license issuing official of the
140 county, proof of his or her retirement from a fire department
Page 5

county, proof of his or her retirement from a fire department
HB253 INTRODUCED
141 that is included on the list provided by the Firefighters'
142 Personnel Standards and Education Commission. Proof of the
143 person's individual's retirement from a fire department
144 included on the that list from the Firefighters' Personnel
145 Standards and Education Commission is not required for renewal
146 of the distinctive license plate.
147 (5) Upon the applicant submitting proof of his or her
148 identification, the professional firefighter or retired
149 professional firefighter shall be issued the requested number
150 of distinctive license plates upon the payment of the regular
151 fee for license plates, as provided by law, but shall not be
152 required to pay the three dollar ($3) fee.
153 (6) Upon the applicant submitting proof of his or her
154 identification, the retired professional firefighter shall be
155 issued the requested number of distinctive license plates upon
156 the payment of the regular license fee for plates, as provided
157 by law, but shall not be required to pay the three dollar ($3)
158 fee.
159 (7)(6) The distinctive license plates so issued shall
160 be used only upon and for personally owned, private passenger
161 vehicles, to include station wagons and pick-up trucks,
162 registered in the name of the retired professional firefighter
163 or professional firefighter making application therefor, and,
164 when so issued to the applicant, shall be used upon the
165 vehicle for which issued in lieu of the standard license
166 plates normally issued for the vehicle.
167 (8)a.(7)a. In addition to any other fees provided for
168 by law, an annual additional fee of one dollar ($1.00) is
Page 6

by law, an annual additional fee of one dollar ($1.00) is
HB253 INTRODUCED
169 added to the cost of the retired professional firefighter and
170 the professional firefighter distinctive license platesplate
171 provided for in this division, effective January 1, 2022. The
172 annual additional fee collected pursuant to this section
173 paragraph shall be distributed by each licensing official to
174 the state Comptroller, less the commission provided in Section
175 40-12-269. The Comptroller shall distribute the total net
176 proceeds monthly into a fund managed by the Alabama Joint Fire
177 Council to be used for the purpose of expanding and
178 maintaining the Alabama Firefighter Memorial located in
179 Tuscaloosa.
180 b. An annual additional fee of ten dollars ($10) is
181 added to the cost of the professional firefighter distinctive
182 license plates provided for in this division. The combined
183 fees shall be distributed by each licensing official to The
184 the state Comptroller, less the commission provided in Section
185 40-12-269. The Comptroller shall distribute the net proceeds
186 monthly as follows:
187 1. Fifty cents ($.50)Twenty-five percent shall be
188 deposited into a fund managed by the Alabama Joint Fire
189 Council and shall be used for the purpose of expanding and
190 maintaining the Alabama Firefighter Memorial located in
191 Tuscaloosa.
192 2. Fifty cents ($.50)Twenty-five percent shall be
193 distributed to the Alabama Joint Fire Council to be used for
194 expenses associated with the Firefighter Peer Support Program.
195 3. Twenty-five percent shall be distributed to the
196 board of the Alabama Firefighters Annuity and Benefit Fund.
Page 7

board of the Alabama Firefighters Annuity and Benefit Fund.
HB253 INTRODUCED
197 4. Twenty-five percent shall be distributed to the
198 secretary-treasurer of the State of Alabama Firefighters
199 Emergency Relief Fund.
200 b.c. The funds generated by this the feefees shall be
201 subject to audit from either the Department of Examiners of
202 Public Accounts or an independent certified public accountant
203 once every three calendar years effective January 1, 2022.
204 (9)(8) Anyone who is proven to have either falsely
205 obtained or certified an individual to obtain a distinctive
206 professional firefighter or retired professional firefighter
207 license plate or a distinctive professional firefighter
208 license plate shall be guilty of a Class C misdemeanor, and
209 upon conviction, shall be punished according to law.
210 (d) Retired professional firefighters firefighter
211 distinctive license plates and professional firefighter
212 distinctive license plates as provided by this section shall
213 be prepared and furnished for the licensing year commencing
214 January 1, 2012, and thereafter as is provided by law for the
215 issuance of other license plates. Professional firefighters
216 distinctive license plates as provided by this section shall
217 be prepared and furnished for the licensing year commencing
218 January 1, 2016, and thereafter as is provided by law for the
219 issuance of other license plates.
220 (e) The Department of Revenue may adopt any rules
221 necessary to administer this section division."
222 Section 2. This act shall become effective on January
223 1, 2027.
Page 8